Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Article 7. Prohibitions and Penalties.

§ 21-287.
Discharge into waters of matter causing pollution.

No county, city, town or other public body, or person shall discharge, or suffer to be discharged, directly or indirectly into any waters of the district any sewage, industrial wastes or other refuse which may or will cause or contribute to pollution of any waters of the district, provided, that this provision shall be applicable only to such part or parts of the waters of a district as shall be bounded and described in a notice, published in a newspaper or newspapers having, in the aggregate, general circulation in all of the counties and cities within which or bordering upon which such part or parts of the waters of the district are located, to the effect that the commission has provided facilities reasonably sufficient in its opinion for the disposal of sewage, which by discharge from public sewer systems might cause or contribute to pollution of the bounded and described part or parts of such waters, and that pollution of the same is forbidden by law. Such a notice shall constitute prima facie evidence of the existence of facilities sufficient for the disposal of such sewage. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit the disposal of sewage and industrial wastes in the manner in which the same is now being disposed of, or in any other reasonable manner, by any county, city or town, no part of which constitutes a part of any district, or by any person in any such county, city or town, no part of which constitutes a part of any district.

History.

1946, p. 363; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii22.

§ 21-288.
Discharge of matter injurious to system.

No county, city, town or other public body, or person shall discharge, or suffer to be discharged, directly or indirectly, into the sewage disposal system or any other facilities of or provided by a commission, any matter or thing which is or may be injurious or deleterious to such sewage disposal system or other facilities.

History.

1946, p. 363; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii22.

§ 21-289.
Jurisdiction.

Jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of the two preceding sections and to grant any remedy or relief authorized by this article shall be in the circuit court of any county and in the corporation court of any city in whole or in part embraced within the district, or within which are located any waters of the district. The remedies, relief and jurisdiction authorized by this section shall be concurrent and cumulative.

History.

1946, p. 364; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii22.

Editor’s note.

Chapter 5 of Title 17, providing for corporation courts in general, which are referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1973, c. 544. See now provisions as to circuit courts, §

17.1-500

et seq.

§ 21-290.
Punishment of violations.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished accordingly.

History.

1946, p. 365; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii28.

Law Review.

For article on problems of water resource management in Virginia, see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 388 (1971).